Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5747YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 2176 Section 1. Section 321.210, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. The department shall immediately 3 suspend the driverâs license of a person without preliminary 4 hearing upon receiving a record of the personâs conviction for 5 exceeding a speed limit with a detected speed of one hundred 6 miles per hour or more. The department shall promptly notify 7 the person of the suspension. 8 Sec. 2. Section 321.277, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 1. A person who drives any operates a vehicle in such manner 11 as to indicate either a willful or a wanton disregard for the 12 safety of persons or property , including but not limited to 13 operating a vehicle at a speed of one hundred miles per hour or 14 more, is guilty of reckless driving. 15 Sec. 3. Section 321.285, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 8. A Except as provided in section 321.286, a person who 18 violates this section for excessive speed in violation of 19 a speed limit commits a simple misdemeanor punishable as a 20 scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 5 . A 21 person who operates a school bus at a speed which exceeds a 22 limit established under this section by ten miles per hour or 23 less commits a simple misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled 24 violation under section 805.8A, subsection 10 . A person who 25 violates any other provision of this section commits a simple 26 misdemeanor. 27 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 321.286 Speeding in excess of 28 ninety-nine miles per hour. 29 A person who operates a motor vehicle with a detected 30 speed of one hundred miles per hour or more commits a simple 31 misdemeanor punishable as a scheduled violation under section 32 805.8A, subsection 5A, and is subject to all of the following: 33 1. The peace officer who detected the speed of one hundred 34 miles per hour or more shall issue a citation and may impound 35 -1- LSB 5747YH (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 6 H.F. 2176 the motor vehicle. 1 2. A court shall not accept a plea of guilty or nolo 2 contendere to a charge for a reduced excessive speed that would 3 be punished pursuant to section 321.285, subsection 8, or other 4 provision of law. 5 Sec. 5. Section 321.383, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 6 to read as follows: 7 5. A person who operates a self-propelled implement of 8 husbandry at a speed which exceeds the limit of thirty-five 9 miles per hour commits a simple misdemeanor punishable as a 10 scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 5 or 5A . 11 Sec. 6. Section 321O.5, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 2. The operator of a personal delivery device that violates 14 this section commits a simple misdemeanor punishable as a 15 scheduled violation under section 805.8A, subsection 5 or 5A . 16 Sec. 7. Section 805.8A, subsection 5, paragraph a, 17 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 For Except as provided in subsection 5A, for excessive 20 speed violations in excess of the limit under section 321.236, 21 subsections 5 and 11 , section 321.285 , section 321.383, 22 subsection 5 , section 321O.5, subsection 1 , and section 23 461A.36 , the scheduled fine shall be the following: 24 Sec. 8. Section 805.8A, subsection 5, paragraph d, Code 25 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 d. For Except as provided in subsection 5A, for a violation 27 under section 321.295 , the scheduled fine is seventy dollars. 28 Sec. 9. Section 805.8A, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 29 following new subsection: 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. Excessive speed in excess of ninety-nine 31 miles per hour. For excessive speed violations with a detected 32 speed of one hundred miles per hour or more, the scheduled 33 fine is five hundred dollars plus five dollars for each mile 34 per hour of excessive speed over twenty miles per hour over 35 -2- LSB 5747YH (4) 91 th/ns 2/ 6 H.F. 2176 the limit under section 321.236, subsections 5 and 11, section 1 321.285, section 321.295, section 321.383, subsection 5, 2 section 321O.5, subsection 1, or section 461A.36. However, 3 paragraphs âbâ and âcâ of subsection 5 apply to excessive speed 4 violations described in those paragraphs. 5 Sec. 10. Section 805.8A, subsection 14, paragraph i, 6 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 The scheduled fine for any moving traffic violation under 9 chapter 321 , as provided in this section , shall be doubled if 10 the violation occurs within any road work zone, as defined in 11 section 321.1 . However, notwithstanding subsection 5 or 5A , 12 the scheduled fine for violating the speed limit in a road work 13 zone is as follows: 14 Sec. 11. Section 805.10, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. When the violation charged involved a 17 person operating a motor vehicle in excess of one hundred ten 18 miles per hour, or in excess of fifty miles per hour over the 19 speed limit. 20 Sec. 12. Section 805.10, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 21 to read as follows: 22 2. In such cases, the defendant shall appear before the 23 court and regular procedure shall apply. If an information 24 is used, the officer shall endorse thereon, âCourt appearance 25 requiredâ. If a citation and complaint is used, the officer 26 shall strike out the space in which the defendant may admit 27 the violation before a scheduled violations office and shall 28 endorse thereon âCourt appearance requiredâ and the defendant 29 shall appear before the court either in person or by attorney , 30 unless the defendant is required to appear pursuant to 31 subsection 1, paragraph âfâ , in which case the defendant shall 32 appear in person . 33